Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-507 Revocation by writing or
by act. (a) A will or any part thereof is revoked by:

(1) Executing a subsequent will that revokes the
previous will or part expressly or by inconsistency; or

(2) Performing a revocatory act on the will, if the
testator performed the act with the intent and for the purpose of revoking the
will or part or if another individual performed the act in the testator's
conscious presence and by the testator's direction. For purposes of this
paragraph, "revocatory act on the will" includes burning, tearing,
canceling, obliterating, or destroying the will or any part of it. A burning,
tearing, or canceling is a "revocatory act on the will", whether or
not the burn, tear, or cancellation touched any of the words on the will.

(b) If a subsequent will does not expressly
revoke a previous will, the execution of the subsequent will wholly revokes the
previous will by inconsistency if the testator intended the subsequent will to
replace rather than supplement the previous will.

(c) The testator is presumed to have intended
a subsequent will to replace rather than supplement a previous will if the
subsequent will makes a complete disposition of the testator's estate. If this
presumption arises and is not rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, the
previous will is revoked; only the subsequent will is operative on the
testator's death.

(d) The testator is presumed to have intended
a subsequent will to supplement rather than replace a previous will if the
subsequent will does not make a complete disposition of the testator's estate.
If this presumption arises and is not rebutted by clear and convincing
evidence, the subsequent will revokes the previous will only to the extent the
subsequent will is inconsistent with the previous will; each will is fully
operative on the testator's death to the extent they are not inconsistent. [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next